src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-yaqwlasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - яˮавлась: # Verb 'to be terrible' /Type 6/ - partial paradigm

     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: яˮавлаиниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: яˮавлаидиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: яˮавлаихиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: яˮавлаиваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: яˮавлаидаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: яˮавлаиˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: яˮавлаидмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: яˮавлаин
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлаи
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: яˮавлаининзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: яˮавлаидинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: яˮавлаихинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: яˮавлаиваць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: яˮавлаидаць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: яˮавлаиць  
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: яˮавлаидамзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: яˮавлаинась
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: яˮавлаись
     яˮавлась+V+IV+ConNeg: яˮавлуˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+Abs: яˮавлавоӈгад  
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxDu1: яˮавлавоӈгаданиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxDu2: яˮавлавоӈгадандиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxDu3: яˮавлавоӈгадандиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxPl1: яˮавлавоӈгаданаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxPl2: яˮавлавоӈгадандаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxPl3: яˮавлавоӈгадандоʼ 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxSg1: яˮавлавоӈгадан
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxSg2: яˮавлавоӈгаданд 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Evas+PxSg3: яˮавлавоӈгаданда
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: яˮавлаӈгуˮ   
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: яˮавлаӈгуниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: яˮавлаӈгудиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яˮавлаӈгухуʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: яˮавлаӈгуваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: яˮавлаӈгудаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: яˮавлаӈгуˮ 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: яˮавлаӈгудмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: яˮавлаӈгун
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлаӈгу
     яˮавлась+V+IV+GerFin: яˮавлаванзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ger: [яˮавла, яˮавлась]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: яˮавлаханиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: яˮавлахаваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: яˮавлахадмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: яˮавлыдиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: яˮавлыдаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: яˮавлуˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: яˮавлыниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: яˮавлыдиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яˮавлыхыʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: яˮавлываˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: яˮавлыдаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: яˮавлыˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: яˮавлыдмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: яˮавлын
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлы
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: яˮавлынинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: яˮавлыдинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яˮавлыхынзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: яˮавлываць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: яˮавлыдаць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: яˮавлыць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: яˮавлыдамзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: яˮавлынась
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яˮавлысь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+InfImprf: яˮавлава
     яˮавлась+V+IV+InfPrf: яˮавлаˮма
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1: яˮавладараханиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2: яˮавладарахадиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3: яˮавладарахахаʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1: яˮавладарахаваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2: яˮавладарахадаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3: яˮавладарахаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1: яˮавладарахадмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2: яˮавладарахан 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавладараха
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu1: яˮавларваниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu2: яˮавларвадиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu3: яˮавларвахаʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl1: яˮавларваваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl2: яˮавларвадаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl3: яˮавларваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg1: яˮавларвадмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg2: яˮавларван
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg3: яˮавларва
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: [яˮавлавандарханиʼ, яˮавлавндарханиʼ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: [яˮавлавандархадиʼ, яˮавлавндархадиʼ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: [яˮавлавандархахаʼ, яˮавлавндархахаʼ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: [яˮавлавандархаваˮ, яˮавлавндархаваˮ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: [яˮавлавандархадаˮ, яˮавлавндархадаˮ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: [яˮавлавандархаˮ, яˮавлавндархаˮ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: [яˮавлавандархадмʼ, яˮавлавндархадмʼ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: [яˮавлавандархан, яˮавлавндархан]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: [яˮавлавандарха, илевндарха]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: яˮавлархавэниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: яˮавлархавэдиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: яˮавлархавэхэʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: яˮавлархавэваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: яˮавлархавэдаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: яˮавлархавыˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: яˮавлархавэдмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: яˮавлархавэн
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: яˮавлархавы
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: яˮавласаниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: яˮавласадиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: яˮавласахаʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: яˮавласаваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: яˮавласадаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: яˮавласаˮ      
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: яˮавласадмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: яˮавласан
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: яˮавласа
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: яˮавлавэниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: яˮавлавэдиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: яˮавлавэхэʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: яˮавлавэваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: яˮавлавэдаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: яˮавлавыˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: яˮавлавэдмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: яˮавлавэн
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавы
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: яˮавлавэнинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: яˮавлавэдинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: яˮавлавэхэнзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: яˮавлавэваць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: яˮавлавэдаць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [яˮавлавыць, яˮавлавэць]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: яˮавлавэдамзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: яˮавлавэнась
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [яˮавлавысь, яˮавлавэсь]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: яˮавлабцуниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: яˮавлабцудиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: яˮавлабцухуʼ 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: яˮавлабцуваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: яˮавлабцудаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: яˮавлабцуˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: яˮавлабцудмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: яˮавлабцун
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: яˮавлабцу
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: яˮавлабцакэниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: яˮавлабцакэдиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: яˮавлабцакэхэʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: яˮавлабцакэваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: яˮавлабцакэдаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: яˮавлабцакыˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: яˮавлабцакэдмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: яˮавлабцакэн
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: яˮавлабцакы
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1: яˮавлавэраханиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2: яˮавлавэрахадиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3: яˮавлавэрахахаʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1: яˮавлавэрахаваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2: яˮавлавэрахадаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3: яˮавлавэрахаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1: яˮавлавэрахадмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2: яˮавлавэрахан
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3: яˮавлавэраха
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1: яˮавлавэкэниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2: яˮавлавэкэдиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3: яˮавлавэкэхэʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1: яˮавлавэкэваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2: яˮавлавэкэдаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3: яˮавлавэкыˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1: яˮавлавэкэдмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2: яˮавлавэкэн
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3: яˮавлавэкы
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: яˮавладакэниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: яˮавладакэдиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: яˮавладакэхэʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: яˮавладакэваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: яˮавладакэдаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: яˮавладакыˮ 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: яˮавладакэдмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: яˮавладакэн
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавладакы
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1: яˮавладакэнинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2: яˮавладакэдинзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3: яˮавладакэханзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1: яˮавладакэваць 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2: яˮавладакэдаць 
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3: яˮавладакыць
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1: яˮавладакэдамзь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2: яˮавладакэнась
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3: яˮавладакысь
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu1: яˮавлавнаниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu2: яˮавлавнадиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu3: яˮавлавнахаʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl1: яˮавлавнаваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl2: яˮавлавнадаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl3: яˮавлавнаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg1: яˮавлавнадмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg2: яˮавлавнан
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg3: яˮавлавна
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu1: яˮавлаванӈгабяниʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu2: яˮавлаванӈгабядиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu3: яˮавлаванӈгабяхаʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl1: яˮавлаванӈгабяваˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl2: яˮавлаванӈгабядаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl3: яˮавлаванӈгабяˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg1: яˮавлаванӈгабядмʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg2: яˮавлаванӈгабян
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg3: яˮавлаванӈгабя
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: яˮавлаяхаʼ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: яˮавлаяˮ
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: яˮавлая
     яˮавлась+V+IV+PrcFut: [яˮавлаванда, яˮавлавнда, яˮавлувнда]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+PrcImprf: яˮавлада
     яˮавлась+V+IV+PrcNeg: [яˮавлавдавэй, яˮавлувдавэй]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+PrcPrf: яˮавлавы
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+Abs: яˮавлабˮ     
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxDu1: [яˮавлабˮнаниʼ, яˮавлабˮниʼ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxDu2: [яˮавлабˮнандиʼ, яˮавлабтиʼ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxDu3: [яˮавлабˮнандиʼ, яˮавлабтиʼ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxPl1: [яˮавлабˮнанаˮ, яˮавлабˮнаˮ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxPl2: [яˮавлабˮнандаˮ, яˮавлабтаˮ]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxPl3: [яˮавлабˮнандоʼ, яˮавлабтоʼ]      
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxSg1: [яˮавлабˮнан, яˮавлабаˮн]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxSg2: [яˮавлабˮнанд, яˮавлабат]
     яˮавлась+V+IV+Subord+PxSg3: [яˮавлабˮнанда, яˮавлабта] 
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавониʼ
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавондиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавондиʼ
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавонаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавондаˮ
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавондоʼ     
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавон
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавонд
     яˮавлась+V+TV+Aud+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: яˮавлавонда
